Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-12,243
Economic Recovery Contingency Fund; created; use; prioritize; investment.

(1) The Economic Recovery Contingency Fund is created. The fund shall consist of transfers by the Legislature to carry out the Economic Recovery Act. Transfers may be made from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the General Fund, the State Park Cash Revolving Fund, or the Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings on and after July 1, 2023, and prior to July 1, 2025, shall be credited to the fund. Beginning July 1, 2025, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

(2) The Department of Economic Development may review the projects listed in the coordination plan and the appendices by the Economic Recovery Special Committee of the Legislature dated January 10, 2023, and shall prioritize the use of the fund on projects listed in the coordination plan followed by the projects in the appendices.

(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer any unobligated funds remaining in the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund on July 31, 2026, to the Inland Port Authority Fund. Any cash fund estimates for administrative costs related to the Economic Recovery Act provided by the Department of Economic Development in a budget request report pursuant to section 81-132 shall be considered an obligation of the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund. Any transfer of money from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund authorized by the Legislature and scheduled to occur after July 31, 2026, shall be considered an obligation of the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund.

Laws 2022, LB1024, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 49;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 32;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 27;

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 56;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 195.

Municipal Inland Port Authority Act, see section 13-3301.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.